Maine, session 132, LD1869.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §407 is enacted to read:
§407. Municipal tax collection
1. Municipal sales tax. The municipality in which a cannabis establishment has been
located pursuant to this Title may collect a sales tax on retail sales transactions conducted
at that establishment pursuant to Title 36, section 1818-A.
2. Unorganized and deorganized areas. For purposes of sales tax collected pursuant
to this section, retail sales transactions at cannabis establishments in unorganized and
deorganized areas are deemed to occur in municipalities.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1818-A is enacted to read:
§1818-A. Local sales tax option on adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis
products
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Cannabis product" means adult use cannabis and an adult use cannabis product as
defined in Title 28-B, section 102-A, subsections 1 and 2, respectively.
B. "Local option sales tax" means a sales tax imposed pursuant to subsection 2.
C. "Participating municipality" means a municipality that has imposed a local option
sales tax pursuant to this section.
2. Authorization to impose local option sales tax. A municipality by referendum
conducted pursuant to subsection 8 may impose a local option sales tax of no more than
1% on cannabis products. A municipality that adopts a local option sales tax pursuant to
this section may not alter the range of items subject to sales tax under this Part.
3. Notify State Tax Assessor. A municipality that imposes a local option sales tax
under subsection 2 shall notify the assessor at least 90 days before the local option sales
tax is effective.
4. Administration. Retailers in a participating municipality shall transfer the revenue
from the local option sales tax at the time and in the manner provided in section 1951-A
for the transfer of state sales tax revenue. The tax is subject to the same enforcement
provisions, interest, penalties and administrative actions as other taxes assessed under this
Part.
5. Distribution of revenue. Each month, the assessor shall identify the amount of
revenue attributable to each participating municipality under this section, subtract the costs
of administering this section and certify the net amount for that participating municipality
to the Treasurer of State. The Treasurer of State shall make monthly payments to municipal
treasurers of the net amounts certified by the assessor under this subsection.
For purposes of this subsection, "costs of administering this section" means the lesser of
the actual cost incurred by the assessor in administering this section and 2% of the total
revenue generated by municipalities that impose a local option sales tax.
6. Use of revenue by participating municipality. The revenue raised by the
imposition of a local option sales tax under this section must be held by the participating
Page 1 - 132LR1501(01)

412 municipality in a special revenue account established for that purpose. Revenue from that
423 account may be expended only for public safety and education initiatives.
7. Effect on revenue sharing and other state aid programs. Revenue received by
the State pursuant to subsection 4 may not be considered to be receipts from the taxes
imposed under this Part for the purpose of transfers to the Local Government Fund under
Title 30-A, section 5681. Revenue received pursuant to subsection 4 may not be used to
reduce or eliminate any funding otherwise due the county or participating municipality
under any provision of law providing aid to the county or participating municipality,
including, but not limited to, aid for schools, roads, municipal assistance or jails.
8. Referendum. The question of whether to impose a local option sales tax must be
submitted to the legal voters of a municipality that seeks to impose the local option sales
tax. The referendum question must indicate the rate of the local option sales tax and
identify the purposes for which the revenue will be used.
The petition process and voting must be held and conducted in accordance with Title 30-A,
sections 2528, 2529 and 2532 even if the municipality has not accepted the provisions of
Title 30-A, section 2528. The voting at elections must be held and conducted in accordance
with Title 21-A. The municipal clerk shall prepare the required ballots, which must contain
substantially the following question:
"Do you favor a local option sales tax of up to 1% to be imposed by [insert
name of municipality] on the sale of adult use cannabis and adult use
cannabis products?"
The voters shall indicate by a cross or check mark placed against the word "Yes" or "No"
their opinion of the same. The municipal clerk shall make a return of the results, certify the
results and send them to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall forward the
results to the assessor.
The local option sales tax on cannabis products may be discontinued by referendum
conducted in the same manner as the referendum adopting the local option sales tax under
this subsection.
9. Effective date of local option sales tax; acceptance by voters. The local option
sales tax authorized by this section takes effect 120 days after the municipal referendum
vote under subsection 8 if it is accepted by a majority of the legal voters voting at the
election and the total number of votes cast equals or exceeds 20% of the total number of
votes cast in that municipality in the most recent gubernatorial election.